Texas statutes.
VERNON'S CIVIL STATUTES

TITLE 49. EDUCATION--PUBLIC

CHAPTER 1. UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS

Art. 2603b-2. CONVEYANCE OF TRACT TO EL PASO COUNTY; STADIUM SITE; LEASE AGREEMENT.

Section 1. The Board of Regents of The University of Texas is hereby authorized and empowered to select a tract of land not exceeding sixty-five (65) acres upon the campus of Texas Western College, El Paso, El Paso County, Texas, a part of The University of Texas System, and to convey such tract so selected to the County of El Paso, Texas, as a stadium site upon which site will be erected and constructed a stadium, parking areas, access roads, and related facilities by the County of El Paso, Texas, at its expense, said conveyance to provide that title to said tract of land shall revert to the Board of Regents should such stadium be abandoned permanently, and said conveyance to contain such other considerations as may be mutually agreeable to the Board of Regents and the County of El Paso.

Sec. 2. The Board of Regents of The University of Texas is further authorized to contract with the County of El Paso for the leasing of the stadium to the Board of Regents of The University of Texas for the use and benefit of Texas Western College by the County of El Paso for a term of ninety-nine (99) years at a consideration of One Dollar ($1.00) per year, said lease to provide for a reservation of use by the County of El Paso for the staging of the Sun Bowl activities and such other considerations as may be mutually agreeable to the Board of Regents and the County of El Paso; said Board of Regents to grant easements to the County of El Paso for right-of-way for public ways as will provide adequate ingress and egress by the public in using said stadium.

Sec. 3. The Board of Regents of The University of Texas and the County of El Paso are hereby authorized to execute and deliver all instruments, including a deed of conveyance and a lease agreement, and do all things necessary to carry out the purpose and intent of this law.

Acts 1961, 57th Leg., p. 23, ch. 13.

Art. 2603b-4. CONVEYANCE OF TRACT TO POLITICAL SUBDIVISIONS IN EL PASO COUNTY; SPECIAL EVENTS CENTER AND RELATED FACILITIES; JOINT USE; EASEMENTS.

Section 1. (a) The Board of Regents of The University of Texas System is hereby authorized to enter into a contract with any political subdivision of the State of Texas located in El Paso County for the conveyance to the political subdivision of a tract or tracts of land owned by The University of Texas at El Paso, a component institution of The University of Texas System, for the purpose of construction by the political subdivision at its own expense of a special events center and related facilities, including parking areas and access roads.

(b) The conveyance shall provide that title to the tract of land shall revert to the Board of Regents of The University of Texas System if the special events center and related facilities are abandoned permanently, and the conveyance shall contain such other consideration as may be mutually agreeable to the Board of Regents of The University of Texas System and the political subdivision.

Sec. 2. The Board of Regents of The University of Texas System is further authorized to contract with the political subdivision for the joint use of the special events center and related facilities by The University of Texas at El Paso and the political subdivision under terms and for considerations as may be mutually agreeable to the parties. The Board of Regents of The University of Texas System is further authorized to grant easements for rights-of-way to provide adequate ingress and egress by the public in using the special events center and related facilities.

Sec. 3. The Board of Regents of The University of Texas System and the political subdivision with whom the Board of Regents of The University of Texas System may contract are hereby authorized to execute and deliver all instruments, including a deed of conveyance and a contract of use, and do all things necessary to carry out the purpose and intent of this Act.

Acts 1967, 60th Leg., p. 1224, ch. 553, eff. Aug. 28, 1967. Amended by Acts 1971, 62nd Leg., p. 883, ch. 114, Sec. 1, eff. May 7, 1971.

Art. 2603i. IMPROVEMENT OF FACILITIES OF INSTITUTE OF MARINE SCIENCE, PORT ARANSAS.

Section 1. The Board of Regents of The University of Texas is hereby authorized to improve the facilities of the Institute of Marine Science, Port Aransas, Texas, an organized research unit of the Main University, Austin, Texas, by constructing and equipping a Research Building on the premises now occupied by the Institute, and by acquiring by purchase, gift, or otherwise any part or all of a strip of land 100 feet by 350 feet adjacent to or near the premises of the Institute of Marine Science, Port Aransas, Texas, wherever the same is accessible to water for the purpose of dredging and maintaining dock facilities for boats owned by The University of Texas.

Sec. 2. The construction and equipping of the Research Building and the acquisition of a site for dock facilities may be financed wholly or in part from any of the following sources: gifts and grants, federal funds, or the Available University Fund.

Sec. 3. The title to the land acquired shall be taken in the name of the Board of Regents of The University of Texas and shall be subject to the control and management of the Board of Regents in the same manner and to the extent that the lands now held by The University of Texas, Austin, Texas, are held and controlled; provided, however, that if said property is donated to The University of Texas, the deed may provide for reversion of the title to the donor if the property is not used and maintained for the purpose of providing docking facilities for university boats.

Acts 1959, 56th Leg., p. 110, ch. 59.

Art. 2603j. EXCHANGE OF LAND WITH DALLAS COUNTY HOSPITAL DISTRICT FOR CHILDREN'S HOSPITAL.

Section 1. AUTHORITY OF BOARD OF REGENTS; TRADE AND EXCHANGE; DESCRIPTION; DEED. The Board of Regents of The University of Texas is hereby authorized and empowered to trade and exchange not more than ten (10) acres of land on the western corner of the campus of The University of Texas Southwestern Medical School in Dallas, Texas, being bound on the north by Inwood Road and on the south by the right-of-way of the Chicago, Rock Island, and Gulf Railway, the same being in the Wm. B. Coats Survey, Abstract No. 236, Dallas County, Texas, for a tract of land of seven and one-half (7-1/2) acres, more or less, belonging to the Dallas County Hospital District, adjacent to the Parkland Memorial Hospital, Dallas, Texas, the same being in the A. Bahn Survey, Abstract No. 182, and/or the Wm. B. Coats Survey, Abstract No. 236, Dallas County, Texas, and to accomplish such trade and exchange the Board of Regents of The University of Texas is authorized and directed to convey on behalf of the State of Texas the ten (10) acre tract of land heretofore described in this Section to the Dallas County Hospital District, owner of the seven and one-half (7-1/2) acre tract above described, upon the execution and delivery of a good and sufficient deed of conveyance from the Dallas County Hospital District to the State of Texas for the use and benefit of the Board of Regents of The University of Texas of the seven and one-half (7-1/2) acre tract.

Sec. 2. CONVEYANCE TO CHILDREN'S MEDICAL CENTER OF DALLAS; PURPOSE; FACILITY FOR UNIVERSITY OF TEXAS SOUTHWESTERN MEDICAL SCHOOL. The Board of Regents of The University of Texas on behalf of the State of Texas is hereby authorized and empowered to convey the seven and one-half (7-1/2) acre tract received in exchange from the Dallas County Hospital District to the governing board of the Children's Medical Center of Dallas, Dallas County, Texas, for a construction site of a children's hospital in consideration of the same being made available as a full-time teaching facility for The University of Texas Southwestern Medical School in Dallas, Texas; provided, however, that neither The University of Texas Southwestern Medical School nor the Board of Regents of The University of Texas shall ever incur any financial obligation or expend any funds appropriated by the Legislature for the construction, maintenance, or operation of such children's hospital.

Sec. 3. EXECUTION OF DEED; ATTESTATION. The deed of conveyance of the land exchanged and of the seven and one-half (7-1/2) acres conveyed to the governing board of the Children's Medical Center of Dallas by the Board of Regents of The University of Texas for and on behalf of the State of Texas shall be executed by the Chairman of the Board of Regents of The University of Texas and attested by its Secretary pursuant to a resolution directing such conveyance.

Sec. 4. CONTENTS OF DEEDS; CONTRACTUAL TERMS. Each deed to be executed as provided for in this Act shall contain by reference any and all easements, reversions, and restrictions to which any tract or tracts conveyed by any party is subject or agreed upon; provided, however, that no deeds shall be exchanged until a contract is negotiated and executed between the Board of Regents of The University of Texas and the governing board of the Children's Medical Center of Dallas which shall obligate the governing board of the Children's Medical Center to construct and operate a children's hospital as a teaching hospital fully integrated with the medical program of The University of Texas Southwestern Medical School, without cost to the State of Texas and which contract shall contain such other terms and conditions as the Board of Regents of The University of Texas shall deem reasonable.

Acts 1961, 57th Leg., p. 215, ch. 113.